Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.530

Multistate nurse license—Conditions of employment.

(1) Beginning September 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, individuals that hold a multistate nurse license issued by a state other than Washington and are employed by assisted living facilities licensed under this chapter shall complete any demographic data surveys required by the board of nursing in rule as a condition of employment.

(2) Individuals that hold a multistate nurse license issued by a state other than Washington and are employed by assisted living facilities licensed under this chapter shall complete the suicide assessment, treatment, and management training required by RCW 43.70.442(5)(a) as a condition of employment.

(3) Assisted living facilities shall report to the board of nursing, within 30 days of employment, all nurses holding a multistate license issued by a state other than Washington and an attestation that the employees holding a multistate license issued by a state other than Washington have completed the tasks required under this section as a condition of employment.

(4) This section is subject to enforcement by the department.

[ 2023 c 123 s 28.]

NOTES:

Short title—2023 c 123: See RCW 18.80.900.